Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8000.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 34-37.1 of the General Laws entitled "Homeless Bill of Rights" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
34-37.1-7. Encampments.
(a) Prior to the forcible removal of encampments on public property, the removing agency
shall provide at least twenty (20) days written notice to the occupants stating the timeframe to
vacate the encampment, which shall be done by the posting of the notice on the encampment itself,
and shall provide a copy of such notice to the executive office of housing ("EOH") and the Regional
Access Points identified and listed by the EOH, unless:
(1) Such encampments are located within a state or federal right of way and there is an
immediate public safety need for the removal of the encampment; or
(2) Such encampments are located in or directly adjacent to an active construction site; or
(3) The encampment interferes with scheduled public infrastructure repairs, maintenance
or inspections; or
(4) The encampment is on or near an area which has environmental hazards; or
(5) There is otherwise an immediate and documented public safety or health concern
regarding the location of the encampment.
(b) An encampment is defined as a temporary shelter erected outdoors in public spaces not
meant for human habitation which may be inhabited by an individual or individuals, and such term
refers to both individuals and their respective personal belongings.

(c) The movement of an encampment by the occupants to another area on the same lot, or
a contiguous lot after a written notice is given to that same encampment in subsection (a) of this
section shall not require a new notice or new notice period prior to removal.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on October 1, 2026.
========
LC005661/SUB A/2
========
LC005661/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 3